Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.223

Bonds—Sale—Security for deposit.

Bonds authorized by RCW 27.12.222 shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. All such bonds shall be legal securities for any bank or trust company for deposit with the state treasurer or any county or city treasurer as security for deposits in lieu of a surety bond under any law relating to deposits of public moneys.

[ 1984 c 186 s 9; 1983 c 167 s 20; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 4; 1955 c 59 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.